Massachusetts, session 194th, H2780.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1 of chapter 150E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by deleting from the first sentence of the definition of “employee” the words
“…and the officers and employees within the departments of the state secretary, state treasurer,
state auditor and attorney general.”
Section 1 of chapter 150E of the General Laws is hereby further amended by adding a
new sentence at the end of the definition of “employer” to read “In the case of employees of the
state secretary, state treasurer, state auditor and attorney general, the employer shall be the state
secretary, state treasurer, state auditor and attorney general respectively.”
of 1